ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ > フリーウェイト、ダンベル、ケトルベル > 各種サンドバッグ: ブルガリアンバッグ; パワーバッグ; ストロングマンサンドバッグ
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów > Ciężarki, hantle i odważniki siłowe > Sandbags: Worki bułgarskie; Worki treningowe Power Bag; Worki z piaskiem Strongman
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting > Frivekter, hantler og kettlebells > Sandsekker: Bulgarian bags; Powerbags; Strongman-sandsekker
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก > ฟรีเวท ดัมเบล และเคตเทิลเบล > กระสอบทราย: บัลแกเรียนแบ็ก; พาวเวอร์แบ็ก; ถุงทรายสตรองแมน
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo > Pesos livres, halteres e kettlebells > Sacos de areia: Sacos búlgaros; Sacos de força; Sacos de areia strongman
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie > Poids libres, haltères et kettlebells > Sacs de sable: Sacs bulgares; Sacs lestés; Sacs de sable Strongman
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés > Szabadsúlyok, kézisúlyzók és kettlebellek > Homokzsákok: Bolgár zsákok; Erőzsákok; Erősember homokzsákok
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning > Frivægte, håndvægte og kettlebells > Sandsække: Bulgarian bags; Power bags; Strongman-sandsække
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ > Tạ không giới hạn trọng lượng, tạ tay & tạ ấm > Bao cát: Túi tạ Bulgarian; Túi cát tập thể lực; Bao cát tập thể lực Strongman
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie > Činky, jednoručky a kettlebelly > Závažia s pieskom: Bulharské vrecia; Posilňovacie vrecia; Vrecia s pieskom pre silových športovcov
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas > Pesas libres, mancuernas y kettlebells > Sacos de arena: Sacos búlgaros; Sacos de potencia; Sacos de arena strongman
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami > Ruční činky, činky dumbbell a činky kettlebell > Pytle s pískem: Bulharské pytle; Posilovací vaky; Zátěžové pytle pro strongmany
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести > Свободни тежести, дъмбели и пудовки > Торби с пясък: Български торби; Силови торби; Силови пясъчни чували
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika > Laisvieji svarsčiai, hanteliai ir girės > Smėlio maišai: Bulgariški krepšiai; Jėgos maišai; Stipruolių smėlio maišai
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso > Pesos livres, halteres e kettlebells > Sacos de areia: Bolsas búlgaras; Power bags; Sandbags strongman
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți > Greutăți libere, gantere și kettlebell > Saci cu nisip: Saci bulgărești; Saci de putere; Saci de nisip pentru strongman
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting > Free Weights, Dumbbells & Kettlebells > Sandbags: Bulgarian Bags; Power Bags; Strongman Sandbags
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών > Ελεύθερα βάρη, αλτήρες & βαράκια με λαβές > Σάκοι άμμου: Βουλγάρικοι σάκοι; Σάκοι γυμναστικής; Σάκοι άμμου strongman
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži > Proste uteži, utežne ročke in uteži z ročaji > Vreče s peskom: Bolgarske torbe; Torbe Power Bags; Vreče s peskom Strongman
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重 > 配重片、哑铃/壶铃 > 沙袋: 保加利亚训练包; 力量训练包; 大力士沙袋
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma > Serbest Ağırlıklar, Dambıllar ve Kettlebell'ler > Kum Torbaları: Bulgar torbaları; Power bag ağırlık çantaları; Strongman kum torbaları
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben > Gewichte, Kurzhanteln und Kettlebells > Sandsäcke: Bulgarian Bags; Power-Bags; Strongman-Sandbags
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика > Свободные веса, гантели и гири > Мешки с песком: Болгарские мешки (сэндбэги); Тренировочные сумки сэндбэг; Тяжелоатлетические сэндбэги
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning > Fria vikter, hantlar och kettlebells > Sandsäckar: Bulgarian bags; Powerbags; Strongman-sandsäckar
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重 > 自由重量、啞鈴和壺鈴 > 沙袋: 保加利亞訓練袋; 能量沙袋; 大力士沙袋
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega > Podesivi utezi, bučice i girje > Vreće s pijeskom za vježbanje: Bugarske torbe; Torbe za vježbanje; Vreće s pijeskom Strongman
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동 > 프리웨이트/덤벨/케틀벨 > 샌드백: 불가리안 백; 파워 백; 스트롱맨 샌드백
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi > Pesi, manubri e kettlebell > Sacchi di sabbia: Sacche bulgare; Power bag; Sacchi di sabbia da strongman
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen > Losse gewichten, halters en kettlebells > Zandzakken: Bulgarian bags; Powerbags; Strongman-zandzakken
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto > Vapaat painot, käsipainot, kahvakuulat > Hiekkasäkit: Bulgarian bags -treenisäkit; Voimasäkit; Voimamies-hiekkasäkit